California, session 20252026, AB1935.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7651 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7651. Application for license as a cemetery broker shall be made in writing on the a form prescribed by the bureau and filed at the principal office of the bureau. The application shall be accompanied by the original cemetery broker’s license fee.